Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4739.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 109u. (1) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall not put an age limit for coverage under the medical assistance program for diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders and treatment of autism spectrum disorders. (2) Not later than 180 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall provide coverage under the medical assistance program for an eligible individual who is 21 years of age or more for diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders and treatment of autism spectrum disorders. If required, the department shall apply for an amendment to this state's Medicaid state plan to include the services described under this subsection. The department shall promptly seek and receive any necessary federal approval to include the services described under this subsection. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Autism spectrum disorders" means any of the following pervasive developmental disorders as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual: (i) Autistic disorder. (ii) Asperger's disorder. (iii) Pervasive developmental disorder not otherwise specified. (b) "Diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders" means assessments, evaluations, or tests, including the autism diagnostic observation schedule, performed by a licensed physician or a licensed psychologist to diagnose whether an individual has 1 of the autism spectrum disorders.